Hawaii statutes.
§88-204 County appropriations directed.
The respective councils of the several counties shall appropriate annually for
each fiscal period a sum sufficient to cover the payment of the pensions
granted under this part; provided that the board of water supply of the city
and county of Honolulu shall appropriate sufficient funds to cover pensions
granted under this part as a result of employment in the service of the board
of water supply. [L 1945, c 262, §4; RL 1955, §6-183; HRS §88-204]

Revision Note

The words "boards of supervisors or", preceding
"councils", have been deleted.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next